District of Columbia statutes.
42-2851.06

Section 8 assistance considered income for non-discrimination and minimum income purposes; requirement to accept section 8 vouchers.

(a)

The monetary assistance provided to an owner of a housing accommodation under section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937, either directly or through a tenant, shall be considered the income of the tenant for the purposes of any minimum income qualification for a dwelling unit in the housing accommodation.

(b)

The monetary assistance provided to an owner of a housing accommodation under section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937, either directly or through a tenant, shall be considered income and a source of income under § 2-1402.21.

(c)

The owner of a housing accommodation shall not refuse to rent a dwelling unit to a person because the person will provide his or her rental payment, in whole or in part, through a section 8 voucher.

Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 206, 49 DCR 1468
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 59, 52 DCR 2638
This section is referenced in § 47-1803.02.
D.C. Law 15-354, in subsec. (b), validated previously made technical changes.
Section 8 of the United States Housing Act, referred to in subsecs. (a) and (b), is Act Sept. 1, 1937, c. 896, Title I, § 8, which is classified to 42 U.S.C. § 1437f.